Vermont, session 2025-2026, S271.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
VT LEG #385926 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.271
2026 Page 2 of 7
(1) Vermont has a compelling interest in protecting its residents,
especially students, educators, and public employees, from both antisemitism
and censorship.
(2) Antisemitism is a real and growing threat that must be clearly
defined to ensure accountability for bias-motivated acts, not conflated with
lawful expression.
(3) The First Amendment to the U.S. Constitution prohibits government
actors from favoring or disfavoring particular political viewpoints.
(4) In recent years, laws or policies in other states and institutions have
led to the suppression of lawful advocacy, particularly in support of Palestinian
human rights.
(5) Jewish, Muslim, Arab, and other communities in Vermont have
expressed concern about the use of vague or overly broad antisemitism
definitions that silence critical political discourse.
(6) Vermont reaffirms that educational institutions must be both safe
and intellectually open environments where civil rights and free speech
coexist.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 570 is amended to read:
§ 570. HARASSMENT, HAZING, AND BULLYING PREVENTION
POLICIES
VT LEG #385926 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.271
2026 Page 3 of 7
(a) State policy. It is the policy of the State of Vermont that all Vermont
educational institutions provide safe, orderly, civil, and positive learning
environments. Harassment, hazing, and bullying have no place and will not be
tolerated in Vermont schools. No Vermont student should feel threatened or
be discriminated against while enrolled in a Vermont school.
(b) Prevention policies. Each school board shall develop, adopt, ensure the
enforcement of, and make available in the manner described under subdivision
563(1) of this title harassment, hazing, and bullying prevention policies that
shall be at least as stringent as model policies developed by the Secretary. Any
school board that fails to adopt one or more of these policies shall be presumed
to have adopted the most current model policy or policies published by the
Secretary.
(c) Notice. Annually, prior to the commencement of curricular and
cocurricular activities, the school board shall provide notice of the policy and
procedures developed under this subchapter to students, custodial parents or
guardians of students, and staff members, including reference to the
consequences of misbehavior contained in the plan required by section 1161a
of this title. Notice to students shall be in age-appropriate language and should
include examples of harassment, hazing, and bullying. At a minimum, this
notice shall appear in any publication that sets forth the comprehensive rules,
procedures, and standards of conduct for the school. The school board shall
VT LEG #385926 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.271
2026 Page 4 of 7
use its discretion in developing and initiating age-appropriate programs to
inform students about the substance of the policy and procedures in order to
help prevent harassment, hazing, and bullying. School boards are encouraged
to foster opportunities for conversations between and among students
regarding tolerance and respect.
(d) Duties of the Secretary. The Secretary shall:
(1) develop Develop and, from time to time, update model harassment,
hazing, and bullying prevention policies; and.
(2) In consultation with the Advisory Council and members of affected
communities, develop and issue guidance and training for school districts for
distinguishing between protected political expression and unlawful harassment
of protected classes to ensure that civil rights enforcement aligns with
constitutional standards. Such guidance shall ensure that staff members
responsible for carrying out the policies and procedures required under this
subchapter 5 have the resources needed to evaluate:
(A) the context and intent of speech;
(B) the difference between targeted harassment and generalized
political critique; and
(C) the risk of chilling student expression.
(2)(3) establish Establish an Advisory Council to review and coordinate
school and statewide activities relating to the prevention of and response to
VT LEG #385926 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.271
2026 Page 5 of 7
harassment, hazing, and bullying. The Council shall report annually in January
to the State Board and the House and Senate Committees on Education. The
Council shall include:
(A) the Executive Director of the Vermont Principals’ Association or
designee;
(B) the Executive Director of the Vermont School Boards
Association or designee;
(C) the Executive Director of the Vermont Superintendents
Association or designee;
(D) the President of the Vermont-National Education Association or
designee;
(E) the Executive Director of the Vermont Human Rights
Commission or designee;
(F) the Executive Director of the Vermont Independent Schools
Association or designee; and
(G) other members selected by the Secretary, as follows:
(i) at least one of whom shall be a current secondary student who
has witnessed or experienced harassment, hazing, or bullying in the school
environment;
(ii) at least one civil liberties expert;
(iii) Jewish and Palestinian community leaders;
VT LEG #385926 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.271
2026 Page 6 of 7
(iv) at least one kindergarten through grade 12 educator;
(v) at least one kindergarten through grade 12 administrator; and
(vi) at least one legal scholar with expertise in First Amendment
jurisprudence and antidiscrimination law.
* * *
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 914 is added to read:
§ 914. FREEDOM OF EXPRESSION
(a) The General Assembly finds that in order to encourage students to
become educated, informed, and responsible members of society, instruction
on the First Amendment to the U.S. Constitution and Chapter I, Article 13 of
the Vermont Constitution shall be provided in public schools.
(b) The Agency of Education shall develop a freedom of expression
curriculum for public elementary and secondary schools that provides students
with age-appropriate foundational knowledge of the protections offered by the
First Amendment to the U.S. Constitution and Chapter I, Article 13 of the
Vermont Constitution that enables students to distinguish between political
advocacy and bias-based harassment such as antisemitism, Islamophobia, and
other forms of religious bias.
Sec. 4. CURRICULUM IMPLEMENTATION
On or before January 1, 2027, the Agency of Education shall develop the
freedom of expression curriculum required pursuant to Sec. 3 of this act, and
VT LEG #385926 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.271
2026 Page 7 of 7
supervisory unions shall include such instruction in their supervisory
unionwide curriculum beginning with the 2027–2028 school year.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385926 v.1